Yamls/Pron-otamod_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun – ӧтамӧд: # Reciprocal Pronoun 'Toisiaan / Друг друга'
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom+Compl: ӧтамӧд
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc: ӧтамӧдӧс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen: ӧтамӧдлӧн
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abl: ӧтамӧдлісь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Dat: ӧтамӧдлӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ins: ӧтамӧдӧн 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com: ӧтамӧдкӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Car: ӧтамӧдтӧг
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cns: ӧтамӧдла
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cmpr: ӧтамӧдся
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ine: ӧтамӧдын
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela: ӧтамӧдісь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill: ӧтамӧдӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Apr: ӧтамӧдлань
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Egr: ӧтамӧдсянь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Prl: ӧтамӧдӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerI: ӧтамӧдӧдз
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerII: ӧтамӧдви
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIne: ӧтамӧдланьын
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEla: ӧтамӧдланись
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIll: ӧтамӧдланьӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEgr: ӧтамӧдланьсянь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprPrl: ӧтамӧдланьӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerI: ӧтамӧдланьӧдз
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerII: ӧтамӧдланьви


    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдыс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдсӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдыслӧн
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдыслісь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдыслӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: ӧтамӧднас 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдыскӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Car+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдыстӧг
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдысла
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдысся
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдас
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдсис
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдас
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдыслань, ӧтамӧдланяс] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдыссянь, ӧтамӧдсяняс]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдӧттяс, ӧтамӧдӧттис]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдӧдззас, ӧтамӧдӧдззис]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдысви
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдланяс, ӧтамӧдысланьын]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдланьсис, ӧтамӧдысланись]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдланяс, ӧтамӧдысланьӧ]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдысланьсянь, ӧтамӧдланьсяняс]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдланьӧттяс, ӧтамӧдланьӧттис]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [ӧтамӧдланьӧдззас, ӧтамӧдланьӧдззис]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: ӧтамӧдысланьви


    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӧтамӧдным
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымӧс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымлӧн
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымлісь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымлӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднаным 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымкӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Car+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымтӧг
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымла
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымся
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: ӧтамӧданым
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: ӧтамӧдсиным
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: ӧтамӧданым
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧднымлань, ӧтамӧдланяным]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧднымсянь, ӧтамӧдсяняным]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдӧттяным, ӧтамӧдӧттиным]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдӧдззаным, ӧтамӧдӧдззиным] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымви
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдланяным, ӧтамӧднымланьын]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдланьсиным, ӧтамӧднымланись]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдланяным, ӧтамӧднымланьӧ]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧднымланьсянь, ӧтамӧдланьсяняным]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдланьӧттяным, ӧтамӧдланьӧттиным, ӧтамӧднымланьӧт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [ӧтамӧдланьӧдззаным, ӧтамӧдланьӧдззиным, ӧтамӧднымланьӧдз] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: ӧтамӧднымланьви


    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӧтамӧдныт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытлӧн
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытлісь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытлӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднаныт 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com+PxPl2: ӧтамӧдныткӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Car+PxPl2: ӧтамӧдныттӧг
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытла
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытся
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: ӧтамӧданыт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: ӧтамӧдсиныт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: ӧтамӧданыт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧднытлань, ӧтамӧдланяныт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧднытсянь, ӧтамӧдсяняныт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдӧттяныт, ӧтамӧдӧттиныт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдӧдззаныт, ӧтамӧдӧдззиныт] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытви
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдланяныт, ӧтамӧднытланьын]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдланьсиныт, ӧтамӧднытланись]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдланяныт, ӧтамӧднытланьӧ]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧднытланьсянь, ӧтамӧдланьсяняныт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдланьӧттяныт, ӧтамӧдланьӧттиныт, ӧтамӧднытланьӧт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [ӧтамӧдланьӧдззаныт, ӧтамӧдланьӧдззиныт, ӧтамӧднытланьӧдз] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: ӧтамӧднытланьви


    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдныс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӧтамӧднысӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдныслӧн
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдныслісь
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдныслӧ
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: ӧтамӧднаныс 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдныскӧт
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Car+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдныстӧг
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: ӧтамӧднысла
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: ӧтамӧднысся
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: ӧтамӧданыс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: ӧтамӧдсиныс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: ӧтамӧданыс
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдныслань, ӧтамӧдланяныс]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдныссянь, ӧтамӧдсяняныс]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдӧттяныс, ӧтамӧдӧттиныс]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдӧдззаныс, ӧтамӧдӧдззиныс] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: ӧтамӧднысви
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдланяныс, ӧтамӧднысланьын]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдланьсиныс, ӧтамӧднысланись]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдланяныс, ӧтамӧднысланьӧ]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧднысланьсянь, ӧтамӧдланьсяняныс]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдланьӧттяныс, ӧтамӧдланьӧттиныс, ӧтамӧднысланьӧт]
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [ӧтамӧдланьӧдззаныс, ӧтамӧдланьӧдззиныс, ӧтамӧднысланьӧдз] 
    ӧтамӧд+Pron+Recipr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: ӧтамӧднысланьви
